Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 2 Peace Officers
§ 7-2-105.
Disposition and appraisal of property seized or held; notice and order to show cause; judgment.

When personal property not subject to be summarily destroyed is seized or held by any peace officer pursuant to any law of this state, or when property seized by any peace officer is delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency under provisions other than W.S.

35-7-1049

, or property is taken into custody as lost, mislaid or abandoned, the head of the law enforcement agency shall forthwith ascertain as closely as practicable:

The approximate value of the property;

The facts giving rise to the seizure or custody;

The name and position of the person making the seizure or taking the property into custody;

The name and address of the owners of the property or those persons who were in possession of the property at the time of the seizure;

The names and addresses of all persons known to have an interest in the property seized.

Any property seized by a peace officer shall be delivered immediately to the appropriate law enforcement agency. The head of the law enforcement agency shall maintain custody of the property pending an order of disposal by the court pursuant to this section unless the property is otherwise released according to this section.

If the property is lost, mislaid, abandoned or unclaimed or if possession of the property is unlawful, the law enforcement agency shall seek in circuit court or district court an order to show cause why the property should not be sold or forfeited and sold at public auction or transferred to the use of the law enforcement agency. If the lawful owner of the property can reasonably be ascertained, the property shall be delivered to him without judicial action unless the property constitutes evidence of a crime, the possession of the property would be unlawful or ownership and interest are in dispute.

Notice and proceedings on the order to show cause shall be according to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, provided notice by publication shall be once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks. The trial of the issues shall be by the court.

On final hearing the order to show cause shall be taken as prima facie evidence that the property is abandoned or unclaimed and is sufficient for a judgment of forfeiture in the absence of other proof.

In disputed ownership cases the burden shall be upon the claimants to show that they are the lawful owners or have a legally recognizable interest in the property.

When the property is encumbered, the court shall, after deducting costs, direct the payment of the encumbrance from the proceeds of any sale of the property or distribute the property equitably between those persons having a legal interest.

The proceedings and judgment of forfeiture shall be in rem and shall be primarily against the property itself.

Upon the entry of a judgment of forfeiture the court shall determine the disposition to be made of the property, which may include the destruction or sale of the property or the allocation of the property to some other governmental function or use or otherwise, as the court may determine.

Sale of the property shall be at public auction to the highest bidder for cash after two (2) weeks public notice as the court may direct.

Upon the application of any claimant, the court may fix the value of a forfeitable interest in the seized property and permit the claimant to redeem the property upon the payment of a sum equal to the value, which sum shall be disposed of as would the proceeds of the sale of the property under a judgment of forfeiture.

The balance of the proceeds, if any, shall be deposited in the general operating account of the state, county or municipal entity that has fiscal authority over the law enforcement agency confiscating the property.

This section does not apply to property which is subject to the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, W.S.

34-24-101

through

34-24-140

.

For purposes of this section, seized property that is not subject to W.S.

35-7-1049

may be summarily destroyed, provided the lawful owner has been contacted and has declined to take possession of the property, including:

Evidence that is no longer needed for the prosecution of a case, or needed for purposes of appellate review of the case;

Evidence in misdemeanor cases in which the district attorney has determined that no suspect has been identified or prosecution has not been pursued for at least one (1) year;

Evidence in felony cases in which the district attorney has determined that no suspect has been identified or prosecution has not been pursued for at least five (5) years;

Soiled, defective, broken or demolished personal property, or waste.

Items of found property with a value of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for which the owner cannot be located, or if the owner has not responded after contact was attempted by the law enforcement agency, may be disposed of after the latter of:

Thirty (30) days after the agency has determined that the owner cannot be located; or

Thirty (30) days after the agency has attempted on at least three (3) nonconsecutive days to contact the owner without response from the owner.

Law enforcement agencies shall preserve biological material that was seized or recovered as evidence in the investigation or prosecution that resulted in a conviction or adjudication as a delinquent for a crime of violence and not consumed in previous DNA testing. The biological material shall be preserved for five (5) years or, except as provided in this section, for as long as any person incarcerated in connection with the case or investigation remains in custody, whichever is longer. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this section, effective July 1, 2008 a law enforcement agency may dispose of the biological material after five (5) years if the law enforcement agency notifies any person who remains incarcerated in connection with the investigation or prosecution and any counsel of record for such person, or if there is no counsel of record, the state public defender, of the intention to dispose of the evidence and the law enforcement agency affords the person not less than one hundred eighty (180) days after the notification to file a motion for DNA testing or preservation of the biological material. The law enforcement agency shall not be required to preserve evidence that is required to be, and has been, returned to its rightful owner, or is of such a size, bulk or physical character as to render retention impracticable. If practicable, the law enforcement agency shall remove and preserve representative portions of the biological material sufficient to permit future DNA testing before returning or disposing of the material.

Whoever willfully or maliciously destroys, alters, conceals or tampers with evidence that is required to be preserved under subsection (r) of this section with the intent to impair the integrity of that evidence, to prevent that evidence from being subjected to DNA testing or to prevent the production or use of that evidence in an official proceeding shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-2-111; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1993, ch. 213, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 182, § 1; 2008, ch. 92, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to forfeiture of devices and equipment used in taking game illegally, see
§

23-6-208

.

As to service of process, see Rules 4 and 5, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment,

in (o), substituted “34-24-140” for “34-24-139.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (p) through (r).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (r) which read: “Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary herein, biological evidence relevant to a felony criminal prosecution shall not be destroyed unless and until the person who was convicted in the case has died”; and added (s).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Return of seized property. —

Both W.R.Cr.P. 41(e) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-2-105

make it plain that a convicted defendant or prisoner may seek to have his property restored to him, absent some justification provided by the State for its continued retention of that property. A prisoner may avail himself of a remedy provided to him by law in said respect, the same being a due process right. Deloge v. State, 2005 WY 152, 123 P.3d 573,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

Taylor v. State, 7 P.3d 15,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 7-2-106.
Extraterritorial authority of peace officers; requests for assignment of peace officers; liability; compensation.

Subject to the limitations in subsection (e) of this section, a peace officer, while outside of his jurisdiction, shall have the same authority that applies to him within his jurisdiction to the same degree and extent only when any one (1) of the following conditions exists:

The peace officer is responding to a request for law enforcement assistance made by a law enforcement agency of another jurisdiction or a specific request to assist another peace officer acting within the scope of his official duties in another jurisdiction;

The peace officer possesses reasonable cause to believe that a crime is occurring involving an immediate threat of serious bodily injury or death to any person; or

The peace officer is in fresh pursuit of a person whom the officer has probable cause to believe has committed within the officer’s jurisdiction a violation of a municipal ordinance or state statute, including traffic infractions, or for whom an arrest warrant is outstanding for any criminal or traffic offense.

Subject to the limitations in subsection (e) of this section, the governing body of any municipality that does not have a police department, the chief of police of any municipality or his designee, or the sheriff of any county or his designee, in accordance with the rules and procedures established by the governing body of any municipality or county, may request the chief of police of any other municipality, or his designee, or the sheriff of any other county, or his designee, to assign certified peace officers under their respective command to perform law enforcement duties within the jurisdiction of the requesting chief of police or sheriff. Peace officers, while so assigned and performing duties, are subject to the direction and control of the requesting chief or sheriff and shall have full peace officer authority within the requesting agency’s jurisdiction during the assignment. The assignments under this subsection shall be restricted to the terms of a written memorandum of understanding entered into in advance by each participating sheriff, chief of police or appropriate supervisor of another agency employing peace officers and by the governing bodies of their respective counties or municipalities. The memorandum of understanding shall, at minimum, specify:

The length of term of the assignment, not to exceed one (1) month beyond the current term of office of any participating sheriff or chief of police;

The certified peace officers covered by the assignment;

A general description of the geographical boundaries of territory covered by the assignment;

The responsibilities of each participating county, municipality and law enforcement agency for costs and expenses related to the assignments, including the cost of all wages, salaries, benefits and damage to equipment belonging to an officer or his employer while acting under the provisions of this subsection.

A peace officer acting pursuant to subsection (a), (b) or (f) of this section outside his own jurisdiction, or a peace officer when providing law enforcement assistance on the Wind River Indian Reservation pursuant to a memorandum of understanding entered in advance and approved by the attorney general, between the department of the interior, Federal Bureau of Indian Affairs or the tribes and the state, county, city or town providing the assistance, shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of his duties for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act and the state self-insurance program, W.S.

1-41-101

through

1-41-111

, or the local government self-insurance program, W.S.

1-42-201

through

1-42-206

. The memorandum of understanding shall contain a provision for immunity from suit in tribal court for activities occurring pursuant to any law enforcement assistance provided under this subsection. Any suit relating to those activities shall be brought only under the terms of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act in the state district court having jurisdiction, or in the federal district court for the district of Wyoming, if appropriate. All privileges and immunities from liability, and all pension, disability, worker’s compensation and other benefits which normally apply to peace officers while they perform their duties in their own jurisdiction shall also apply to them when acting as provided in subsection (a), (b) or (f) of this section and shall apply to peace officers when providing law enforcement assistance on the Wind River Indian Reservation pursuant to this subsection. For purposes of W.S.

27-14-104

and subsection (a), (b) or (f) of this section, the requesting and assigning law enforcement agencies shall be a joint employer as defined under W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xix) and the designated peace officer shall be a joint employee as defined under W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xxi).

The cost of salary and benefits accruing to a peace officer acting pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be borne by the individual peace officer’s own employing agency. The cost of any damage to equipment belonging to the officer or his employer occurring while acting pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be borne by the requesting law enforcement agency.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a peace officer:

As defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(F), (H) or (J) to act pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of this section; or

As defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E) or (G) to act pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii) or (iii) or subsection (b) of this section; or

As defined in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(E), (F) or (J) to act pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

Subject to the limitations in paragraph (e)(iii) of this section, the department of state parks and cultural resources may request any other agency or governing body employing peace officers to assign peace officers qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

under their respective command to perform law enforcement duties within the jurisdiction of the department of state parks and cultural resources. Peace officers, while so assigned and performing duties, are subject to the direction and control of the department of state parks and cultural resources and shall have full peace officer authority within the department’s jurisdiction during the assignment. The assignments under this subsection shall be restricted to the terms of a written memorandum of understanding entered into in advance by the department and each participating agency employing peace officers. The memorandum of understanding shall, at minimum, specify:

The length of term of the assignment;

The peace officers covered by the assignment;

A general description of the geographical boundaries of territory covered by the assignment;

The responsibilities of the department and each participating law enforcement agency for costs and expenses related to the assignments, including the cost of all wages, salaries, benefits and damage to equipment belonging to an officer or his employer while acting under the provisions of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 167, § 1; 2004, ch. 45, § 1; 2007, ch. 212, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2011, ch. 160, § 1; 2013 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2004 amendment,

rewrote the section, amending the extraterritorial authority of peace officers and specifying limitations.

Laws 2004, ch. 45, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “1-42-201” for “1-42-101” in (c).

The 2008 amendment

substituted “1-42-206” for “1-42-207” at the end of the first sentence of (c).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

in (c), added “or (f)” throughout, and made related changes; added (e)(iii), and made related changes; and added (f).

Laws 2011, ch. 160, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, or a peace officer when providing law enforcement assistance on the Wind River Indian Reservation pursuant to a memorandum of understanding entered in advance and approved by the attorney general, between the department of the interior, Federal Bureau of Indian Affairs or the tribes and the state, county, city or town providing the assistance,” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, added “and shall apply to peace officers when providing law enforcement assistance on the Wind River Indian Reservation pursuant to this subsection” at the end of the third sentence, and added “and subsection (a), (b) or (f) of this section” in the fourth sentence in (c).

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. —

See §

1-39-101

,

1-39-103

(a)(viii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, states: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act..”

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 7-2-107.
Arrest or detention of persons with diplomatic immunities.

This section applies to an individual who upon being stopped, detained or arrested by a peace officer for a violation of W.S.

6-2-106

, a driving while under the influence offense or a moving violation pursuant to the motor vehicle laws of Wyoming or local ordinance, provides a driver’s license issued by the United States department of state or otherwise claims immunities or privileges pursuant to title 22, chapter 6 of the United States Code.

If a driver as described in subsection (a) of this section is stopped, detained or arrested by a peace officer who has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed a violation described in subsection (a) of this section, the peace officer shall:

Within a reasonable amount of time, contact the United States department of state and verify the driver’s status and possible immunity;

Record relevant information from the driver’s license or identification card issued by the United States department of state; and

Within five (5) days after the date of the stop, forward the following to the United States department of state:

A written report of the incident; and

A copy of the citation or other charging document if issued.

The provisions of this section do not prohibit the application of any law to a criminal violation by any individual who claims immunities pursuant to title 22, chapter 6 of the United States Code.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 64, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions pertaining to immunity and privileges for foreign diplomats may be found at 22 U.S.C. § 254a et seq.

§ 7-2-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2006, ch. 71, § 1, related to the free tuition and fees for education of survivors of deceased peace officers.

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

Laws 2007, ch. 96, § 2 states:

“(a)

Section 1 of this act is effective only if 2007 House Bill 112 is not enacted into law. If section 1 of this act becomes effective it shall be effective as of July 1, 2007.”